District of Columbia statutes.
7-743.05

Advisory Committee on Physician Assistants.

(a)

There is established an Advisory Committee on Physician Assistants to consist of 3 members as follows:

(1)

The Director of the Department of Health, or his or her designee;

(2)

A physician or osteopath licensed in the District with experience working with physician assistants; and

(3)

A physician assistant licensed in the District.

(b)

Of the appointees to the Advisory Committee on Physician Assistants other than the Director, one shall serve an initial term of 2 years and one shall serve an initial term of 3 years. Subsequent appointments shall be for terms of 3 years.

(c)

(1)

The Advisory Committee on Physician Assistants shall develop and submit to the Board of Medicine guidelines for licensing and regulating physician assistants in the District. The guidelines shall set forth the actions that physician assistants may perform in collaboration with a licensed physician or osteopath, who shall be responsible for the overall medical direction of the care and treatment of patients and the level of collaboration required for each action.

(2)

(A)

Guidelines approved by the Board of Medicine under § 3-1202.03 shall remain in effect until revised guidelines are submitted to and approved by the Board of Medicine.

(B)

The Advisory Committee on Physician Assistants shall submit revised guidelines to the Board of Medicine by June 22, 2015.

(3)

The Advisory Committee on Physician Assistants shall meet at least annually to review guidelines and make necessary revisions for submission to the Board of Medicine.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4945
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 202(b), 62 DCR 1884